District of Columbia statutes.
22-4705

Repealed

Receiving stolen goods

Repealed.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(y)-(gg), 29 DCR 3976
Former § 22-2202, 1981 Ed., had been amended by D.C. Law 4-202.
1981 Ed., §§ 22-2201 to 22-2208.